Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3760.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking Section 6 in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the
following new section:-
Section 6. Every motor vehicle or trailer registered under this chapter when operated in or
on any way in this commonwealth shall have its register number displayed conspicuously
thereon by the number plate furnished by the registrar in accordance with section two or five or
by a temporary number plate authorized by the registrar as hereinafter provided, at the rear of
said motor vehicle, and one number plate to be attached at the rear of said trailer, but if the
registrar issues but one number plate it shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle so that it shall
always be plainly visible. The said number plate shall be kept clean with the numbers legible and
shall not be obscured in any manner by the installation of any device obscuring said numbers,
and during the period when the vehicle or trailer is required to display lights the register number
shall be illuminated so as to be plainly visible at a distance of sixty feet. No number plates other
of 2

than such as are procured from the registrar or such as may be authorized by him for temporary
use, except as provided in section three, shall be displayed on any motor vehicle or trailer so
operated; provided, that a motor vehicle or trailer which by reason of its interstate operation is
registered in this commonwealth and elsewhere may display the register number plates of this
and any other state or country in which it is registered, if, while being operated on the ways of
this commonwealth, the number plates furnished by the registrar, or temporary number plates
authorized by him as hereinafter provided, are displayed as required hereby. If any number plate
supplied by the registrar is lost or mutilated or if the register number thereon becomes illegible,
the owner or person in control of the vehicle for which said number plate was furnished shall
make application for a new number plate, and thereupon the registrar shall issue to such
applicant a permit allowing him to place a temporary number plate bearing his register number
on said vehicle until a number plate of the regular design is made and delivered to said applicant;
provided, that all such temporary number plates and the register numbers thereon shall conform
to the regular number plates and be displayed as nearly as may be as herein provided for said
regular number plates. Any motor vehicle or trailer may, if duly registered, be operated, pushed,
drawn or towed or remain upon any way between the hours of twelve o'clock noon on the date
on which its registration expires and twelve o'clock noon on the following day, if the following
day is the first day of the new registration period, and if such vehicle or trailer displays its
register number for either registration period as otherwise required by this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 90, Section 2 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2024 edition
is hereby amended by striking in line 165 the word “two” and inserting in place thereof the word
“one”.
of 2